Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 2 Liquor Control Administration

3-2-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 82; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 123; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 4, effective July 1, 1996.

3-2-2.
Supervision.

The department has general supervision of the conduct of the business of manufacturing, importing, exporting, storing, transporting, keeping for sale, and selling beverages.

The department may lease a warehouse for the purpose of efficiently exercising its powers and duties of inspection and may upon reasonable charges store beverages for license holders in the warehouse. No lease shall be for a longer period than five (5) years and every lease shall contain the provision that if it becomes unlawful to manufacture, keep for sale, and to sell beverages in this state it shall become void.

The department has the power at any time to issue, renew, revoke and cancel all manufacturers’, wholesalers’ and retailers’ Class G licenses and permits as are provided for by this title.

The department shall supervise and inspect all licensed places to enforce the provisions of this title and the conditions, rules and regulations which the department establishes and authorizes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 13; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 6; P.L. 1941, ch. 1038, § 2; P.L. 1952, ch. 3044, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-2-2

; P.L. 1970, ch. 79, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 2.

3-2-3.
Bureau of inspection — Superintendent.

Within the department, there is a bureau of inspection. The superintendent of the bureau shall be appointed by the director of business regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 74; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-2-3

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 2.

3-2-3.1.
Bureau of importation — Superintendent.

Within the division of taxation there is a bureau of importation. The superintendent of the bureau is appointed by the director of the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 3.

3-2-4.
Superintendents ineligible to hold other office.

Any person qualifying for the office of superintendent of the bureau of importation or superintendent of the bureau of inspection shall cease to hold any other elective office under the laws of this state. Anyone holding any office of trust and confidence under the laws of the United States shall not be eligible to qualify for the office of superintendent of the bureau of importation or inspection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 52; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 123; G.L. 1956, §

3-2-4

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 2.

3-2-5.
Administration of oaths — Subpoena power — False swearing.

The superintendents of the bureaus of importation and inspection are authorized to administer oaths in matters on formal hearing before them and also in connection with any matter having to do with the performance of their duties.

The department in all cases before it is authorized and empowered to summon witnesses by subpoena signed by the director of the department and to compel those witnesses to attend and testify in the same manner as in either the supreme or the superior courts.

The department is authorized to compel the production of all papers, books, documents, records, certificates or other legal evidence that may be necessary for the determination and the decision of any question or the discharge of any duty required by law of the department, by issuing a subpoena duces tecum signed by the director. Any person who disobeys that writ is considered in contempt of the department, and the department may punish that and any other contempt of its authority in the same manner as contempts may be punished in either the supreme or the superior court.

Any person who willfully swears falsely in any proceeding, matter or hearing before the department is guilty of the crime of perjury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 123; G.L. 1956, §

3-2-5

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 2.

3-2-6.
Suspension or revocation of license for refusing official’s access to licensed premises.

If any inspector or other officer charged with the duty of supervision or inspection of places licensed under the provisions of this title is refused access to any licensed premises at a time when any person is within the licensed premises, after exhibiting his or her credentials if requested, that refusal shall be a sufficient ground for the suspension or revocation of that license.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 164, § 6, as enacted by P.L. 1940, ch. 814, § 9; P.L. 1941, ch. 1038, § 2; P.L. 1952, ch. 3044, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-2-6

.

3-2-7.
Records of the department.

All records of the department relating to liquor control are declared to be public records and are open to public inspection under any rules that the department of business regulation makes. The governor and attorney general are authorized to require the department to furnish to them any record, information, copy of any document, paper, book or other thing in their possession. Certified copies of any part of the records of the department are prima facie evidence of the matters contained in the records.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 79; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 123; G.L. 1956, §

3-2-7

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art 36, § 2.

3-2-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 9; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 123; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 4, effective July 1, 1996.